Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1033.
do enact as follows:SB1033,11Section 1. 66.1105 (2) (cm) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1033,2,7266.1105 (2) (cm) “Mixed-use development” means development that contains 3a combination of industrial, commercial, or residential uses, except that lands 4proposed for newly platted residential use, as shown in the project plan, may not 5exceed 35 percent, by area, of the real property within the district or, if the district 6is in the Village of Somers, 50 percent, by area, of the real property within the 7district.SB1033,2,88